Illinois, session 104th, SB3914.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Employees Group Insurance Act of 1971 5is amended by changing Section 3 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 375/3)  (from Ch. 127, par. 523)7    Sec. 3. Definitions. Unless the context otherwise 8requires, the following words and phrases as used in this Act 9shall have the following meanings. The Department may define 10these and other words and phrases separately for the purpose 11of implementing specific programs providing benefits under 12this Act.13    (a) "Administrative service organization" means any 14person, firm, or corporation experienced in the handling of 15claims which is fully qualified, financially sound, and 16capable of meeting the service requirements of a contract of 17administration executed with the Department.18    (b) "Annuitant" means (1) an employee who retires, or has 19retired, on or after January 1, 1966 on an immediate annuity 20under the provisions of Articles 2, 14 (including an employee 21who has elected to receive an alternative retirement 22cancellation payment under Section 14-108.5 of the Illinois 23Pension Code in lieu of an annuity or who meets the criteria   SB3914- 2 -LRB104 20721 JDS 34224 b1for retirement, but in lieu of receiving an annuity under that 2Article has elected to receive an accelerated pension benefit 3payment under Section 14-147.5 of that Article), 15 (including 4an employee who has retired under the optional retirement 5program established under Section 15-158.2 or who meets the 6criteria for retirement but in lieu of receiving an annuity 7under that Article has elected to receive an accelerated 8pension benefit payment under Section 15-185.5 of the 9Article), paragraph (2), (3), or (5) of Section 16-106 10(including an employee who meets the criteria for retirement, 11but in lieu of receiving an annuity under that Article has 12elected to receive an accelerated pension benefit payment 13under Section 16-190.5 of the Illinois Pension Code), or 14Article 18 of the Illinois Pension Code; (2) any person who was 15receiving group insurance coverage under this Act as of March 1631, 1978 by reason of his status as an annuitant, even though 17the annuity in relation to which such coverage was provided is 18a proportional annuity based on less than the minimum period 19of service required for a retirement annuity in the system 20involved; (3) any person not otherwise covered by this Act who 21has retired as a participating member under Article 2 of the 22Illinois Pension Code but is ineligible for the retirement 23annuity under Section 2-119 of the Illinois Pension Code; (4) 24the spouse of any person who is receiving a retirement annuity 25under Article 18 of the Illinois Pension Code and who is 26covered under a group health insurance program sponsored by a   SB3914- 3 -LRB104 20721 JDS 34224 b1governmental employer other than the State of Illinois and who 2has irrevocably elected to waive his or her coverage under 3this Act and to have his or her spouse considered as the 4"annuitant" under this Act and not as a "dependent"; or (5) an 5employee who retires, or has retired, from a qualified 6position, as determined according to rules promulgated by the 7Director, under a qualified local government, a qualified 8rehabilitation facility, a qualified domestic violence shelter 9or service, or a qualified child advocacy center. (For 10definition of "retired employee", see subsection (p)).11    (b-5) (Blank).12    (b-6) (Blank).13    (b-7) (Blank).14    (c) "Carrier" means (1) an insurance company, a 15corporation organized under the Limited Health Service 16Organization Act or the Voluntary Health Services Plans Act, a 17partnership, or other nongovernmental organization, which is 18authorized to do group life or group health insurance business 19in Illinois, or (2) the State of Illinois as a self-insurer.20    (d) "Compensation" means salary or wages payable on a 21regular payroll by the State Treasurer on a warrant of the 22State Comptroller out of any State, trust or federal fund, or 23by the Governor of the State through a disbursing officer of 24the State out of a trust or out of federal funds, or by any 25Department out of State, trust, federal, or other funds held 26by the State Treasurer or the Department, to any person for   SB3914- 4 -LRB104 20721 JDS 34224 b1personal services currently performed, and ordinary or 2accidental disability benefits under Articles 2, 14, 15 3(including ordinary or accidental disability benefits under 4the optional retirement program established under Section 515-158.2), paragraph (2), (3), or (5) of Section 16-106, or 6Article 18 of the Illinois Pension Code, for disability 7incurred after January 1, 1966, or benefits payable under the 8Workers' Compensation Act or the Workers' Occupational 9Diseases Act or benefits payable under a sick pay plan 10established in accordance with Section 36 of the State Finance 11Act. "Compensation" also means salary or wages paid to an 12employee of any qualified local government, qualified 13rehabilitation facility, qualified domestic violence shelter 14or service, or qualified child advocacy center.15    (e) "Commission" means the State Employees Group Insurance 16Advisory Commission authorized by this Act. Commencing July 1, 171984, "Commission" as used in this Act means the Commission on 18Government Forecasting and Accountability as established by 19the Legislative Commission Reorganization Act of 1984.20    (f) "Contributory", when referred to as contributory 21coverage, shall mean optional coverages or benefits elected by 22the member toward the cost of which such member makes 23contribution, or which are funded in whole or in part through 24the acceptance of a reduction in earnings or the foregoing of 25an increase in earnings by an employee, as distinguished from 26noncontributory coverage or benefits which are paid entirely   SB3914- 5 -LRB104 20721 JDS 34224 b1by the State of Illinois without reduction of the member's 2salary.3    (g) "Department" means any department, institution, board, 4commission, officer, court, or any agency of the State 5government receiving appropriations and having power to 6certify payrolls to the Comptroller authorizing payments of 7salary and wages against such appropriations as are made by 8the General Assembly from any State fund, or against trust 9funds held by the State Treasurer and includes boards of 10trustees of the retirement systems created by Articles 2, 14, 1115, 16, and 18 of the Illinois Pension Code. "Department" also 12includes the Illinois Comprehensive Health Insurance Board, 13the Board of Examiners established under the Illinois Public 14Accounting Act, and the Illinois Finance Authority.15    (h) "Dependent", when the term is used in the context of 16the health and life plan, means a member's spouse and any child 17(1) from birth to age 26, including an adopted child, a child 18who lives with the member from the time of the placement for 19adoption until entry of an order of adoption, a stepchild or 20adjudicated child, or a child who lives with the member if such 21member is a court appointed guardian of the child or (2) age 19 22or over who has a mental or physical disability from a cause 23originating prior to the age of 19 (age 26 if enrolled as an 24adult child dependent). For the health plan only, the term 25"dependent" also includes (1) any person enrolled prior to the 26effective date of this Section who is dependent upon the   SB3914- 6 -LRB104 20721 JDS 34224 b1member to the extent that the member may claim such person as a 2dependent for income tax deduction purposes and (2) any person 3who has received after June 30, 2000 an organ transplant and 4who is financially dependent upon the member and eligible to 5be claimed as a dependent for income tax purposes. A member 6requesting to cover any dependent must provide documentation 7as requested by the Department of Central Management Services 8and file with the Department any and all forms required by the 9Department. 10    (i) "Director" means the Director of the Illinois 11Department of Central Management Services.12    (j) "Eligibility period" means the period of time a member 13has to elect enrollment in programs or to select benefits 14without regard to age, sex, or health.15    (k) "Employee" means and includes each officer or employee 16in the service of a department who (1) receives his 17compensation for service rendered to the department on a 18warrant issued pursuant to a payroll certified by a department 19or on a warrant or check issued and drawn by a department upon 20a trust, federal or other fund or on a warrant issued pursuant 21to a payroll certified by an elected or duly appointed officer 22of the State or who receives payment of the performance of 23personal services on a warrant issued pursuant to a payroll 24certified by a Department and drawn by the Comptroller upon 25the State Treasurer against appropriations made by the General 26Assembly from any fund or against trust funds held by the State   SB3914- 7 -LRB104 20721 JDS 34224 b1Treasurer, and (2) is employed full-time or part-time in a 2position normally requiring actual performance of duty during 3not less than 1/2 of a normal work period, as established by 4the Director in cooperation with each department, except that 5persons elected by popular vote will be considered employees 6during the entire term for which they are elected regardless 7of hours devoted to the service of the State, and (3) except 8that "employee" does not include any person who is not 9eligible by reason of such person's employment to participate 10in one of the State retirement systems under Articles 2, 14, 15 11(either the regular Article 15 system or the optional 12retirement program established under Section 15-158.2), or 18, 13or under paragraph (2), (3), or (5) of Section 16-106, of the 14Illinois Pension Code, but such term does include persons who 15are employed during the 6-month qualifying period under 16Article 14 of the Illinois Pension Code. Such term also 17includes any person who (1) after January 1, 1966, is 18receiving ordinary or accidental disability benefits under 19Articles 2, 14, 15 (including ordinary or accidental 20disability benefits under the optional retirement program 21established under Section 15-158.2), paragraph (2), (3), or 22(5) of Section 16-106, or Article 18 of the Illinois Pension 23Code, for disability incurred after January 1, 1966, (2) 24receives total permanent or total temporary disability under 25the Workers' Compensation Act or the Workers' Occupational 26Diseases Act as a result of injuries sustained or illness   SB3914- 8 -LRB104 20721 JDS 34224 b1contracted in the course of employment with the State of 2Illinois, or (3) is not otherwise covered under this Act and 3has retired as a participating member under Article 2 of the 4Illinois Pension Code but is ineligible for the retirement 5annuity under Section 2-119 of the Illinois Pension Code. 6However, a person who satisfies the criteria of the foregoing 7definition of "employee" except that such person is made 8ineligible to participate in the State Universities Retirement 9System by clause (4) of subsection (a) of Section 15-107 of the 10Illinois Pension Code is also an "employee" for the purposes 11of this Act. "Employee" also includes any person receiving or 12eligible for benefits under a sick pay plan established in 13accordance with Section 36 of the State Finance Act. 14"Employee" also includes (i) each officer or employee in the 15service of a qualified local government, including persons 16appointed as trustees of sanitary districts regardless of 17hours devoted to the service of the sanitary district, (ii) 18each employee in the service of a qualified rehabilitation 19facility, (iii) each full-time employee in the service of a 20qualified domestic violence shelter or service, and (iv) each 21full-time employee in the service of a qualified child 22advocacy center, as determined according to rules promulgated 23by the Director.24    (l) "Member" means an employee, annuitant, retired 25employee, or survivor. In the case of an annuitant or retired 26employee who first becomes an annuitant or retired employee on   SB3914- 9 -LRB104 20721 JDS 34224 b1or after January 13, 2012 (the effective date of Public Act 297-668), the individual must meet the minimum vesting 3requirements of the applicable retirement system in order to 4be eligible for group insurance benefits under that system. In 5the case of a survivor who is not entitled to occupational 6death benefits pursuant to an applicable retirement system or 7death benefits pursuant to the Workers' Compensation Act, and 8who first becomes a survivor on or after January 13, 2012 (the 9effective date of Public Act 97-668), the deceased employee, 10annuitant, or retired employee upon whom the annuity is based 11must have been eligible to participate in the group insurance 12system under the applicable retirement system in order for the 13survivor to be eligible for group insurance benefits under 14that system. 15    In the case of a survivor who is entitled to occupational 16death benefits pursuant to the deceased employee's applicable 17retirement system or death benefits pursuant to the Workers' 18Compensation Act, and first becomes a survivor on or after 19January 1, 2022, the survivor is eligible for group health 20insurance benefits regardless of the deceased employee's 21minimum vesting requirements under the applicable retirement 22system, with a State contribution rate of 100%, until an 23unmarried child dependent reaches the age of 18, or the age of 2422 if the dependent child is a full-time student, or until the 25adult survivor becomes eligible for benefits under the federal 26Medicare health insurance program (Title XVIII of the Social   SB3914- 10 -LRB104 20721 JDS 34224 b1Security Act, as added by Public Law 89-97). In the case of a 2survivor currently receiving occupational death benefits 3pursuant to the deceased employee's applicable retirement 4system or has received death benefits pursuant to the Workers' 5Compensation Act, who first became a survivor prior to January 61, 2022, the survivor is eligible for group health insurance 7benefits regardless of the deceased employee's minimum vesting 8requirements under the applicable retirement system, with a 9State contribution rate of 100%, until an unmarried child 10dependent reaches the age of 18, or the age of 22 if the 11dependent child is a full-time student, or until the adult 12survivor becomes eligible for benefits under the federal 13Medicare health insurance program (Title XVIII of the Social 14Security Act, as added by Public Law 89-97). The changes made 15by Public Act 102-714 with respect to survivors who first 16became survivors prior to January 1, 2022 shall apply upon 17request of the survivor on or after April 29, 2022 (the 18effective date of Public Act 102-714). 19    (m) "Optional coverages or benefits" means those coverages 20or benefits available to the member on his or her voluntary 21election, and at his or her own expense.22    (n) "Program" means the group life insurance, health 23benefits, and other employee benefits designed and contracted 24for by the Director under this Act.25    (o) "Health plan" means a health benefits program offered 26by the State of Illinois for persons eligible for the plan.  SB3914- 11 -LRB104 20721 JDS 34224 b1    (p) "Retired employee" means any person who would be an 2annuitant as that term is defined herein but for the fact that 3such person retired prior to January 1, 1966. Such term also 4includes any person formerly employed by the University of 5Illinois in the Cooperative Extension Service who would be an 6annuitant but for the fact that such person was made 7ineligible to participate in the State Universities Retirement 8System by clause (4) of subsection (a) of Section 15-107 of the 9Illinois Pension Code.10    (q) "Survivor" means a person receiving an annuity as a 11survivor of an employee or of an annuitant. "Survivor" also 12includes: (1) the surviving dependent of a person who 13satisfies the definition of "employee" except that such person 14is made ineligible to participate in the State Universities 15Retirement System by clause (4) of subsection (a) of Section 1615-107 of the Illinois Pension Code; (2) the surviving 17dependent of any person formerly employed by the University of 18Illinois in the Cooperative Extension Service who would be an 19annuitant except for the fact that such person was made 20ineligible to participate in the State Universities Retirement 21System by clause (4) of subsection (a) of Section 15-107 of the 22Illinois Pension Code; (3) the surviving dependent of a person 23who was an annuitant under this Act by virtue of receiving an 24alternative retirement cancellation payment under Section 2514-108.5 of the Illinois Pension Code; and (4) a person who 26would be receiving an annuity as a survivor of an annuitant   SB3914- 12 -LRB104 20721 JDS 34224 b1except that the annuitant elected on or after June 4, 2018 to 2receive an accelerated pension benefit payment under Section 314-147.5, 15-185.5, or 16-190.5 of the Illinois Pension Code 4in lieu of receiving an annuity.5    (q-2) "SERS" means the State Employees' Retirement System 6of Illinois, created under Article 14 of the Illinois Pension 7Code. 8    (q-3) "SURS" means the State Universities Retirement 9System, created under Article 15 of the Illinois Pension Code. 10    (q-4) "TRS" means the Teachers' Retirement System of the 11State of Illinois, created under Article 16 of the Illinois 12Pension Code. 13    (q-5) (Blank). 14    (q-6) (Blank).15    (q-7) (Blank).16    (r) "Medical services" means the services provided within 17the scope of their licenses by practitioners in all categories 18licensed under the Medical Practice Act of 1987.19    (s) "Unit of local government" means any county, 20municipality, township, school district (including a 21combination of school districts under the Intergovernmental 22Cooperation Act), special district or other unit, designated 23as a unit of local government by law, which exercises limited 24governmental powers or powers in respect to limited 25governmental subjects, any not-for-profit association with a 26membership that primarily includes townships and township   SB3914- 13 -LRB104 20721 JDS 34224 b1officials, that has duties that include provision of research 2service, dissemination of information, and other acts for the 3purpose of improving township government, and that is funded 4wholly or partly in accordance with Section 85-15 of the 5Township Code; any not-for-profit corporation or association, 6with a membership consisting primarily of municipalities, that 7operates its own utility system, and provides research, 8training, dissemination of information, or other acts to 9promote cooperation between and among municipalities that 10provide utility services and for the advancement of the goals 11and purposes of its membership; the Southern Illinois 12Collegiate Common Market, which is a consortium of higher 13education institutions in Southern Illinois; the Illinois 14Association of Park Districts; and any hospital provider that 15is owned by a county that has 100 or fewer hospital beds and 16has not already joined the program. "Qualified local 17government" means a unit of local government approved by the 18Director and participating in a program created under 19subsection (i) of Section 10 of this Act.20    (t) "Qualified rehabilitation facility" means any 21not-for-profit organization that is accredited by the 22Commission on Accreditation of Rehabilitation Facilities or 23certified by the Department of Human Services (as successor to 24the Department of Mental Health and Developmental 25Disabilities) to provide services to persons with disabilities 26and which receives funds from the State of Illinois for   SB3914- 14 -LRB104 20721 JDS 34224 b1providing those services, approved by the Director and 2participating in a program created under subsection (j) of 3Section 10 of this Act.4    (u) "Qualified domestic violence shelter or service" means 5any Illinois domestic violence shelter or service and its 6administrative offices funded by the Department of Human 7Services (as successor to the Illinois Department of Public 8Aid), approved by the Director and participating in a program 9created under subsection (k) of Section 10.10    (v) "TRS benefit recipient" means a person who:11        (1) is not a "member" as defined in this Section; and12        (2) is receiving a monthly benefit or retirement 13    annuity under Article 16 of the Illinois Pension Code or 14    would be receiving such monthly benefit or retirement 15    annuity except that the benefit recipient elected on or 16    after June 4, 2018 to receive an accelerated pension 17    benefit payment under Section 16-190.5 of the Illinois 18    Pension Code in lieu of receiving an annuity; and19        (3) either (i) has at least 8 years of creditable 20    service under Article 16 of the Illinois Pension Code, or 21    (ii) was enrolled in the health insurance program offered 22    under that Article on January 1, 1996, or (iii) is the 23    survivor of a benefit recipient who had at least 8 years of 24    creditable service under Article 16 of the Illinois 25    Pension Code or was enrolled in the health insurance 26    program offered under that Article on June 21, 1995 (the   SB3914- 15 -LRB104 20721 JDS 34224 b1    effective date of Public Act 89-25), or (iv) is a 2    recipient or survivor of a recipient of a disability 3    benefit under Article 16 of the Illinois Pension Code.4    (w) "TRS dependent beneficiary" means a person who:5        (1) is not a "member" or "dependent" as defined in 6    this Section; and7        (2) is a TRS benefit recipient's: (A) spouse, (B) 8    dependent parent who is receiving at least half of his or 9    her support from the TRS benefit recipient, or (C) 10    natural, step, adjudicated, or adopted child who is (i) 11    under age 26, (ii) was, on January 1, 1996, participating 12    as a dependent beneficiary in the health insurance program 13    offered under Article 16 of the Illinois Pension Code, or 14    (iii) age 19 or over who has a mental or physical 15    disability from a cause originating prior to the age of 19 16    (age 26 if enrolled as an adult child).17    "TRS dependent beneficiary" does not include, as indicated 18under paragraph (2) of this subsection (w), a dependent of the 19survivor of a TRS benefit recipient who first becomes a 20dependent of a survivor of a TRS benefit recipient on or after 21January 13, 2012 (the effective date of Public Act 97-668) 22unless that dependent would have been eligible for coverage as 23a dependent of the deceased TRS benefit recipient upon whom 24the survivor benefit is based. 25    (x) "Military leave" refers to individuals in basic 26training for reserves, special/advanced training, annual   SB3914- 16 -LRB104 20721 JDS 34224 b1training, emergency call up, activation by the President of 2the United States, or any other training or duty in service to 3the United States Armed Forces.4    (y) (Blank).5    (z) "Community college benefit recipient" means a person 6who:7        (1) is not a "member" as defined in this Section; and8        (2) is receiving retirement income from a self-managed 9    plan account under Section 15-158.2 of the Illinois 10    Pension Code or is receiving a monthly survivor's annuity 11    or retirement annuity under Article 15 of the Illinois 12    Pension Code or would be receiving such monthly survivor's 13    annuity or retirement annuity except that the benefit 14    recipient elected on or after June 4, 2018 to receive an 15    accelerated pension benefit payment under Section 15-185.5 16    of the Illinois Pension Code in lieu of receiving an 17    annuity; and18        (3) either (i) was a full-time employee of a community 19    college district or an association of community college 20    boards created under the Public Community College Act 21    (other than an employee whose last employer under Article 22    15 of the Illinois Pension Code was a community college 23    district subject to Article VII of the Public Community 24    College Act) and was eligible to participate in a group 25    health benefit plan as an employee during the time of 26    employment with a community college district (other than a   SB3914- 17 -LRB104 20721 JDS 34224 b1    community college district subject to Article VII of the 2    Public Community College Act) or an association of 3    community college boards, or (ii) is the survivor of a 4    person described in item (i).5    (aa) "Community college dependent beneficiary" means a 6person who:7        (1) is not a "member" or "dependent" as defined in 8    this Section; and9        (2) is a community college benefit recipient's: (A) 10    spouse, (B) dependent parent who is receiving at least 11    half of his or her support from the community college 12    benefit recipient, or (C) natural, step, adjudicated, or 13    adopted child who is (i) under age 26, or (ii) age 19 or 14    over and has a mental or physical disability from a cause 15    originating prior to the age of 19 (age 26 if enrolled as 16    an adult child).17    "Community college dependent beneficiary" does not 18include, as indicated under paragraph (2) of this subsection 19(aa), a dependent of the survivor of a community college 20benefit recipient who first becomes a dependent of a survivor 21of a community college benefit recipient on or after January 2213, 2012 (the effective date of Public Act 97-668) unless that 23dependent would have been eligible for coverage as a dependent 24of the deceased community college benefit recipient upon whom 25the survivor annuity is based. 26    (bb) "Qualified child advocacy center" means any Illinois   SB3914- 18 -LRB104 20721 JDS 34224 b1child advocacy center and its administrative offices funded by 2the Department of Children and Family Services, as defined by 3the Children's Advocacy Center Act, approved by the Director 4and participating in a program created under subsection (n) of 5Section 10. 6    (cc) "Placement for adoption" means the assumption and 7retention by a member of a legal obligation for total or 8partial support of a child in anticipation of adoption of the 9child. The child's placement with the member terminates upon 10the termination of such legal obligation. 11(Source: P.A. 104-417, eff. 8-15-25.) 12    Section 10. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 13changing Section 15-132.2 as follows: 14    (40 ILCS 5/15-132.2)15    Sec. 15-132.2. Retire and retirement. A participant 16"retires", and his or her "retirement" begins, when his or her 17annuity payment period begins. A participant in the 18self-managed plan "retires", and the participant's 19"retirement" begins, when the participant is eligible for 20retirement under this Article, and Article 20 if applicable, 21and the participant begins receiving retirement income from 22the participant's self-managed plan account. 23(Source: P.A. 91-887, eff. 7-6-00.)